Arkansas, session 2025, SB160.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 24-4-101(30), as amended by Acts 2025, No.
311, § 2, concerning the definition of "participating public employer" as it
applies to the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, is amended to
add an additional subdivision read as follows:
(D) The Arkansas Development Finance Authority;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 24-4-104(b), concerning the membership of
the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, is
amended to add additional subdivisions to read as follows:
(5) The Secretary of the Department of Shared Administrative
Services; and
(6) The Bank Commissioner.

/s/J. Dotson


*LJH095*
03-31-2025 10:40:21 LJH095